src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kirkko_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:

  Noun - kirkko: #KISSA --
    kirkko+N+Sg+Nom:  kirkko
    kirkko+N+Sg+Gen:  kirho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Acc:  kirho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirkon
    kirkko+N+Sg+Loc:  kirhoost
    kirkko+N+Sg+Com:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Sg+Abe:  kirhottáá
    kirkko+N+Ess:  kirkkon
    kirkko+N+Par:  kirkkod
    kirkko+N+Pl+Nom:  kirhoh
    kirkko+N+Pl+Gen:  kirhoi
    kirkko+N+Pl+Acc:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Ill:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Loc:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Com:  [kirhoiguin, kirhoigijn]
    kirkko+N+Pl+Abe:  kirhoittáá
    
  Noun - pargo: # ok PARGO 
    pargo+N+Sg+Nom:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Gen:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Acc:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Ill:  paargon
    pargo+N+Sg+Loc:  pargoost
    pargo+N+Sg+Com:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Sg+Abe:  pargottáá
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargon
    pargo+N+Par:  pargod
    pargo+N+Pl+Nom:  pargoh
    pargo+N+Pl+Gen:  pargoi
    pargo+N+Pl+Acc:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Ill:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Loc:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Pl+Com:  [pargoiguin, pargoigijn]
    pargo+N+Pl+Abe:  pargoittáá

  Noun - jasko: # ok PARGO
    jasko+N+Sg+Nom:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Gen:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Acc:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Ill:  jaaskon
    jasko+N+Sg+Loc:  jaskoost
    jasko+N+Sg+Com:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Sg+Abe:  jaskottáá
    jasko+N+Ess:  jaskon
    jasko+N+Par:  jaskod
    jasko+N+Pl+Nom:  jaskoh
    jasko+N+Pl+Gen:  jaskoi
    jasko+N+Pl+Acc:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Ill:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Loc:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Pl+Com:  [jaskoiguin, jaskoigijn]
    jasko+N+Pl+Abe:  jaskoittáá
  
  Noun - asto: # ok PARGO
    asto+N+Sg+Nom:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill:  aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc:  astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com:  astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe:  astottáá
    asto+N+Ess:  aston
    asto+N+Par:  astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom:  astoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen:  astoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc:  astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com:  [astoiguin, astoigijn]
    asto+N+Pl+Abe:  astoittáá

  Noun - kerho: # PARGO
    kerho+N+Sg+Nom:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Gen:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Acc:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Ill:  keerhon
    kerho+N+Sg+Loc:  kerhoost
    kerho+N+Sg+Com:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Sg+Abe:  kerhottáá
    kerho+N+Ess:  kerhon
    kerho+N+Par:  kerhod
    kerho+N+Pl+Nom:  kerhoh
    kerho+N+Pl+Gen:  kerhoi
    kerho+N+Pl+Acc:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Ill:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Loc:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Pl+Com:  [kerhoiguin, kerhoigijn]
    kerho+N+Pl+Abe:  kerhoittáá
     
